Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 11
JUDICIAL REVIEW

44-10-1101. Judicial review.

Decisions by the state licensing authority are subject to judicial review pursuant to section 24-4-106.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2932, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-12-801 and 44-11-801 as they existed prior to 2020.